California, session 20252026, SB552.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 706 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:706. After finding that a minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, the court shall hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition to be made of the minor. The court shall receive in evidence the social study of the minor made by the probation officer and any other relevant and material evidence that may be offered, including any written or oral statement offered by the victim, the parent or guardian of the victim if the victim is a minor, or if the victim has died or is incapacitated, the victim’s next of kin, as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 656.2. In addition, if the probation officer has recommended that the minor be transferred to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice pursuant to an adjudication for an offense requiring him or her the minor to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code, the SARATSO selected pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 290.04 of the Penal Code shall be used to assess the minor, and the court shall receive that risk assessment score into evidence. If the probation officer has recommended that the minor be adjudged a ward of the court, the social study shall include a case plan, as required by either Section 706.2 or by Sections 706.5 and 706.6. In any judgment and order of disposition, the court shall state that the social study and case plan made by the probation officer has have been read and that the social study study, case plan, and any statement has made by the victim have been considered by the court.SEC. 2. Section 706.2 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:706.2. (a) Services to minors are best provided in a framework that integrates service planning and delivery among multiple service systems, including the mental health system, using a team-based approach, such as a child and family team. A child and family team brings together individuals that engage with the child or youth and family in assessing, planning, and delivering services. Use of a team approach increases efficiency, and thus reduces cost, by increasing coordination of formal services and integrating the natural and informal supports available to the child or youth and family.(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “child and family team” has the same meaning as in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.(2) In its development of the case plan, the probation agency shall consider and document any recommendations of the child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501. The agency shall document the rationale for any inconsistencies between the case plan and the child and family team recommendations.(c) If wardship is recommended by the probation officer, but they do not recommend removal of the minor from their parent or guardian, or they recommend commitment of the minor to a juvenile home, ranch, camp, forestry camp, or juvenile hall pursuant to Section 730, the social study prepared by the probation officer that is received into evidence at disposition pursuant to Section 706 shall include a case plan, as described in this section. The case plan shall either be attached to the social study or incorporated as a separate section within the social study. The court shall review and consider the case plan. After receiving input from the parties regarding the case plan, the court may modify the case plan to meet the individualized needs of the minor or nonminor.(d) If wardship is not recommended by the probation officer prior to disposition, but the court orders wardship, the court shall order the probation officer to prepare a case plan, as described in this section, within 30 judicial days of the wardship order. The case plan shall be filed with the court.(e) The case plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1) Specific time-limited goals and related services and activities designed to meet the minor’s or nonminor’s rehabilitative and accountability needs.(2) Input from the minor and family regarding the needs of the minor, and services and activities to enhance the minor’s satisfactory completion of probation.(3) Assignment of the specific persons or agency responsible for carrying out the planned services and activities related to each case plan objective.(4) The projected date of completion of the case plan objectives.(5) A statement that the parent or legal guardian and the minor have had an opportunity to participate in the development of the case plan, to review the case plan, to sign the case plan, and to receive a copy of the plan, or an explanation about why the parent, legal guardian, or minor was not able to participate in or sign the case plan.(f) Prior to each review hearing, the probation officer shall update the case plan required by this section. Each updated case plan shall include a description of the minor’s progress, a description of services that have been provided to the minor under the plan, and an evaluation of the appropriateness and effectiveness of those services.SEC. 3. Section 727 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:727. (a) (1) If a minor or nonminor is adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that the minor or nonminor is a person described by Section 601 or 602, the court may make any reasonable orders for the care, supervision, custody, conduct, maintenance, and support of the minor or nonminor, including medical treatment, subject to further order of the court.(2) In the discretion of the court, a ward may be ordered to be on probation without supervision of the probation officer. The court, in so ordering, may impose on the ward any and all reasonable conditions of behavior as may be appropriate under this disposition. A minor or nonminor who has been adjudged a ward of the court on the basis of the commission of any of the offenses described in subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 707, Section 459 of the Penal Code, or subdivision (a) of Section 11350 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be eligible for probation without supervision of the probation officer. A minor or nonminor who has been adjudged a ward of the court on the basis of the commission of an offense involving the sale or possession for sale of a controlled substance, except misdemeanor offenses involving marijuana, as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or of an offense in violation of Section 32625 of the Penal Code, shall be eligible for probation without supervision of the probation officer only if the court determines that the interests of justice would best be served and states reasons on the record for that determination.(3) If a case plan is required pursuant to Section 706.2 or pursuant to Sections 706.5 and 706.6, the court shall order the ward to comply with the case plan.(3)(4) In all other cases, the court shall order the care, custody, and control of the minor or nonminor to be under the supervision of the probation officer.(4)(5) It is the responsibility, pursuant to Section 672(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, of the probation agency to determine the appropriate placement for the ward once the court issues a placement order. In determination of the appropriate placement for the ward, the probation officer shall consider any recommendations of the child and family. In an Indian child custody proceeding as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, the provisions of Section 361.31 shall apply. The probation agency may place the minor or nonminor in any of the following:(A) The approved home of a relative or the approved home of a nonrelative, extended family member as defined in Section 362.7, or, in an Indian child custody proceeding, an extended family member as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1. If a decision has been made to place the minor in the home of a relative, the court may authorize the relative to give legal consent for the minor’s medical, surgical, and dental care and education as if the relative caregiver were the custodial parent of the minor.(B) A foster home, the approved home of a resource family as defined in Section 16519.5, a tribally approved home as described by subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 and Section 10553.12, or a home or facility as described in Section 361.31 and Section 105 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915).(C) A suitable licensed community care facility, as identified by the probation officer, except a youth homelessness prevention center licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1502.35 of the Health and Safety Code.(D) A foster family agency, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 11400 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, in a suitable certified family home or with a resource family.(E) A minor or nonminor dependent may be placed in a group home vendored by a regional center pursuant to Section 56004 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations or a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400 and paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. The placing agency shall also comply with requirements set forth in paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.2, that includes, but is not limited to, authorization, limitation on length of stay, extensions, and additional requirements related to minors. For youth 13 years of age or older, the chief probation officer of the county probation department, or their designee, shall approve the placement if it is longer than 12 months, and no less frequently than every 12 months thereafter.(F) (i) A minor adjudged a ward of the juvenile court shall be entitled to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A state or local regulation or policy shall not prevent, or create barriers to, participation in those activities. Each state and local entity shall ensure that private agencies that provide foster care services to wards have policies consistent with this section and that those agencies promote and protect the ability of wards to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or their responsible designee, and a caregiver, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, in determining whether to give permission for a minor residing in foster care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or their responsible designee, and a caregiver shall take reasonable steps to determine the appropriateness of the activity taking into consideration the minor’s age, maturity, and developmental level. For every minor placed in a setting described in subparagraphs (A) through (E), inclusive, age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities shall include access to computer technology and the internet.(ii) A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, facility manager, or their responsible designee, is encouraged to consult with social work or treatment staff members who are most familiar with the minor at the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program in applying and using the reasonable and prudent parent standard.(G) For nonminors, an approved supervised independent living setting, as defined in Section 11400, including a residential housing unit certified by a licensed transitional housing placement provider.(5)(6) The minor or nonminor shall be released from juvenile detention upon an order being entered under paragraph (3), (4), unless the court determines that a delay in the release from detention is reasonable pursuant to Section 737.(b) (1) To facilitate coordination and cooperation among agencies, the court may, at any time after a petition has been filed, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, join in the juvenile court proceedings any agency that the court determines has failed to meet a legal obligation to provide services to a minor, for whom a petition has been filed under Section 601 or 602, to a nonminor, as described in Section 303, or to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. In any proceeding in which an agency is joined, the court shall not impose duties upon the agency beyond those mandated by law. The purpose of joinder under this section is to ensure the delivery and coordination of legally mandated services to the minor. The joinder shall not be maintained for any other purpose. Nothing in this section shall prohibit agencies that have received notice of the hearing on joinder from meeting prior to the hearing to coordinate services.(2) The court has no authority to order services unless it has been determined through the administrative process of an agency that has been joined as a party, that the minor, nonminor, or nonminor dependent is eligible for those services. With respect to mental health assessment, treatment, and case management services pursuant to an individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, the court’s determination shall be limited to whether the agency has complied with that chapter.(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “agency” means any governmental agency or any private service provider or individual that receives federal, state, or local governmental funding or reimbursement for providing services directly to a child, nonminor, or nonminor dependent.(c) If a minor has been adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that the minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, and the court finds that notice has been given in accordance with Section 661, and if the court orders that a parent or guardian shall retain custody of that minor either subject to or without the supervision of the probation officer, the parent or guardian may be required to participate with that minor in a counseling or education program, including, but not limited to, parent education and parenting programs operated by community colleges, school districts, or other appropriate agencies designated by the court.(d) (1) The juvenile court may direct any reasonable orders to the parents and guardians of the minor who is the subject of any proceedings under this chapter as the court deems necessary and proper to carry out subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), including orders to appear before a county financial evaluation officer, to ensure the minor’s regular school attendance, and to make reasonable efforts to obtain appropriate educational services necessary to meet the needs of the minor.(2) If counseling or other treatment services are ordered for the minor, the parent, guardian, or foster parent shall be ordered to participate in those services, unless participation by the parent, guardian, or foster parent is deemed by the court to be inappropriate or potentially detrimental to the minor.(e) The court may, after receipt of relevant testimony and other evidence from the parties, affirm or reject the placement determination. If the court rejects the placement determination, the court may instruct the probation department to determine an alternative placement for the ward, or the court may modify the placement order to an alternative placement recommended by a party to the case after the court has received the probation department’s assessment of that recommendation and other relevant evidence from the parties.SEC. 4. Section 727.05 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:727.05. (a) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 727, the probation agency may make an emergency placement of a minor ordered into its care, custody, and control with a relative or nonrelative extended family member.(b) Prior to making the emergency placement, the probation agency shall do all of the following:(1) Conduct an in-home inspection to assess the safety of the home and the ability of the relative or nonrelative extended family member to care for the minor’s needs.(2) Ensure that a state-level criminal records check is conducted by an appropriate government agency through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) pursuant to Section 16504.5 for all of the following:(A) Any person over 18 years of age living in the home of the relative or nonrelative extended family member who seeks emergency placement of the minor, excluding any person who is a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.(B) At the discretion of the probation agency, any person over 18 years of age known to the agency to be regularly present in the home, other than any professional providing professional services to the minor.(C) At the discretion of the agency, any person over 14 years of age living in the home who the agency believes may have a criminal record, excluding any child who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(3) Conduct a check of allegations of prior child abuse or neglect concerning the relative or nonrelative extended family member and other adults in the home.(c) (1) If the CLETS information that is obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that a person has no criminal record, the probation agency may place the minor in the home on an emergency basis.(2) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that a person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (B) or (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed in the home unless a criminal records exemption has been granted using the exemption criteria specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a minor may be placed on an emergency basis if the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense not described in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, pending a criminal records exemption decision based on live scan fingerprint results if all of the following conditions are met:(A) The conviction does not involve an offense against a child.(B) The chief probation officer, or their designee, determines that the placement is in the best interests of the minor.(C) No party to the case objects to the placement.(4) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been arrested for any offense described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed on an emergency basis in the home until the investigation required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code has been completed and the chief probation officer, or their designee, and the court have considered the investigation results when determining whether the placement is in the best interests of the child.(5) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed in the home on an emergency basis.(6) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (5), or the placement recommendation of the county probation agency, the court may authorize the placement of a child on an emergency basis in the home of a relative, regardless of the status of any criminal record exemption or resource family approval, if the court finds that the placement does not pose a risk to the health and safety of the child.(d) If the relative or nonrelative extended family member has not submitted an application for approval as a resource family at the time of the emergency placement, the probation agency shall require the relative or nonrelative extended family member to submit the application and initiate the home environment assessment no later than five business days after the emergency placement.(e) Unless the fingerprint clearance check has already been initiated, the probation agency shall ensure that, within five days of the emergency placement, a fingerprint clearance check of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and any other person whose criminal record was obtained pursuant to this section is initiated through the Department of Justice to ensure the accuracy of the criminal records check conducted through the CLETS and to ensure criminal record clearance of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and all adults in the home pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16519.5 and any associated written directives or regulations.(f) An identification card from a foreign consulate or foreign passport shall be considered a valid form of identification for conducting a criminal records check pursuant to this section.SEC. 5. Section 727.06 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 727.05, to read:727.06. The court shall review the ward’s progress toward meeting the goals in a case plan developed pursuant to Section 706.2 or pursuant to Sections 706.5 and 706.6 at a hearing no less than once every six months after the disposition hearing.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.